Missouri, session 2026, SB855.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 170, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 170.390, to read as
follows:
170.390. 1. For purposes of this section, the
following terms shall mean:
(1) "Dehumanization", the violation of a person's
human rights or bodily autonomy, including, but not limited
to, violations of a person's agency that occur as a result
of genocide or slavery;
(2) "Department", the department of elementary and
secondary education;
(3) "Marginalized groups", groups of people who have
been subjected to dehumanization for reasons that may or may
not relate to identifying traits such as national origin,
race, or sex.
2. The state board of education shall convene a work
group to be known as the "Humanity Education Curriculum
Framework Work Group" for purposes of developing a
curriculum framework of age appropriate instruction for
students in grades six to twelve on the dehumanization of

SB 855 2
marginalized groups in Missouri. The department shall
develop the curriculum framework in partnership with the
work group. Members of the work group shall include, but
shall not be limited to, educators or other experts in the
areas of history, human rights, or social science.
3. The curriculum framework shall be designed to
deepen students' knowledge and understanding of topics that
shall include, but shall not be limited to, the following:
(1) Dehumanization practices that have occurred or may
be occurring in Missouri;
(2) The dangers that may occur when dehumanization of
others goes unchallenged;
(3) The dangers of indifference toward the
dehumanization of others;
(4) How to identify the warning signs of future
dehumanization of others;
(5) The interventions that may be available to prevent
dehumanization of others;
(6) How to examine the world with greater insight; and
(7) The preservation of the story of Celia, an
enslaved woman of African descent born in 1836 and purchased
in 1850 at the age of fourteen by Robert Newsom, a Missouri
farmer. Celia was a victim of chattel slavery and sexual
violence who was executed in Missouri in 1855 for defending
herself against Robert Newsom.
4. The curriculum framework shall incorporate age
appropriate instruction on the dehumanization of
marginalized groups in Missouri, including, but not limited
to, the following:
(1) African Americans and persons of African descent;
(2) Immigrant Americans, including German and Irish
immigrants;

SB 855 3
(3) Native Americans, including the Chickasaw,
Delaware, Kanza, Ioway, Otoe-Missouria, Osage, Quapaw, Sac
and Fox, Shawnee, and Missouri tribes; and
(4) Victims of abduction, exploitation, human
trafficking, kidnapping, and sexual assault.
5. The curriculum framework shall be aligned to
existing awareness weeks or months that may include, but
shall not be limited to, the following:
(1) American Education Week in November;
(2) Black History Month in February;
(3) Immigrant Heritage Month in June;
(4) Native American Heritage Month in November;
(5) Sexual Assault Awareness Month in April; and
(6) Universal Human Rights Month in December.
6. The department shall conduct a pilot program in
consultation with the work group in the 2027-28 and 2028-29
school years. The curriculum framework shall be made
available to up to twenty-five school districts or schools
within a school district as part of the pilot program.
7. (1) As part of the pilot program, the work group
shall develop a professional development program for
teachers to be known as the "Celia Professional Development
Program for Teachers". Each school district or school that
participates in the pilot program shall provide a plan of
professional development to such district's or school's
teachers and may voluntarily participate in the Celia
professional development program for teachers.
(2) The Celia professional development program for
teachers shall include instructional guidance and
incorporate examples of curriculum resources developed by
publishers of nonfiction, trade books, and primary sources
that are age appropriate and consistent with the curriculum

SB 855 4
framework and that deal with civil rights, genocide, the
Holocaust, human rights violations, and slavery. The
instructional guidance shall encourage the incorporation of
liberator, rescuer, survivor, and witness oral testimony.
As used in this subdivision, "oral testimony" means the
firsthand accounts of significant historical events
presented in a format that includes, but is not limited to,
in-person testimony or a multimedia option, such as a DVD or
an online video.
(3) The Celia professional development program for
teachers shall include guidance on class visits to historic
sites in Missouri relating to the story of Celia's
enslavement, abuse, and execution.
8. Upon completion of the first year of the pilot
program, the department shall evaluate the success and
impact of the pilot program and shall report the results of
such evaluation to:
(1) The joint committee on education or any successor
100 committee;
101 (2) The house committee on elementary and secondary
102 education or any other education committee designated by the
103 speaker of the house of representatives; and
104 (3) The senate committee on education or any other
105 education committee designated by the president pro tempore
106 of the senate.
107 9. Beginning with the 2029-30 school year and in all
108 subsequent school years, the curriculum framework and Celia
109 professional development program for teachers shall be made
110 available to all school districts and charter schools in the
111 state. The department shall periodically update the
112 curriculum framework and Celia professional development
113 program for teachers in consultation with educators or other

SB 855 5
114 experts in the areas of history, human rights, or social
115 science.
✓